Florida, session 2026, HB401.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 99.122, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
99.122 Protective security detail for nominees and
officers-elect.—
(1) Immediately upon the adjournment of the meeting of the
Elections Canvassing Commission certifying the results of the
primary election under s. 102.111, the Department of Law
Enforcement must provide a protective security detail to all
nominees of a political party, other than the nominees of a
minor political party, to the following offices:
(a) The Governor.
(b) The Lieutenant Governor.
(c) A cabinet officer.
(2) The protective security detail must be provided
immediately upon the adjournment of the meeting of the Elections
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb401-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 401 2026
Canvassing Commission certifying the results of the primary
election under s. 102.111 until the relevant nominee concedes
the general election or upon adjournment of the meeting of the
Elections Canvassing Commission certifying the results of the
general election under s. 102.111, whichever is earlier. The
Department of Law Enforcement must continue to provide a
protective security detail to the officers-elect until the
officers-elect assume office.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb401-00